Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 12
Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-12-101. Title.

This chapter may be known and may be cited as the “Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund Act”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 895, § 1.

8-12-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the Natural Resources Damages Advisory Board;

“Fund” means the Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund created by this chapter; and

“Natural resources” means land, fish, wildlife, biota, air, surface water, groundwater, drinking water supplies, and other such resources belonging to, managed by, held in trust by, appertaining to, or otherwise controlled by the State of Arkansas or local government.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 895, § 1.

8-12-103. Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to be known as the “Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund”.

In addition to all moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund, there shall be deposited into the fund all payments collected by the state for restoration, rehabilitation, replacement, or acquisition of natural resources, any moneys received by the state as a gift or donation to the fund or any federal moneys designated to enter the fund, and all interest earned upon moneys deposited into the fund.

All moneys received into the fund shall be utilized for natural resource restoration, rehabilitation, replacement, or acquisition.

All expenditures from the fund shall be authorized by the Natural Resources Damages Advisory Board according to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements or conditions of any orders, settlement agreements, gifts, or donations.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 895, § 1.

Cross References.

Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund, § 19-5-1107.

8-12-104. Natural Resources Damages Advisory Board.

There is hereby created and established a Natural Resources Damages Advisory Board.

The board shall be composed of seven (7) members:

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation;

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Arkansas Forestry Commission;

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Division of Environmental Quality;

One (1) member shall be a representative from the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;

One (1) member shall be a representative of the Division of Arkansas Heritage; and

One (1) member shall be a representative of the Attorney General's office.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

To develop projects for the restoration, rehabilitation, replacement, and acquisition of natural resources;

To request proposals for natural resource-related projects;

To review and evaluate proposals for natural resource-related projects;

To select projects for the restoration, rehabilitation, replacement, and acquisition of natural resources; and

To approve payments from the Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund for projects and other activities relating to the restoration, rehabilitation, replacement, and acquisition of natural resources.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 895, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3017.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(4).

8-12-105. Duties of the Department of Finance and Administration.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall administer the Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund, as authorized by the Natural Resources Damages Advisory Board.

The department shall undertake the following activities, as authorized by the board:

Develop and issue requests for proposals;

Award grants for projects relating to natural resource restoration, rehabilitation, replacement, and acquisition;

Contract for services; and

Make payments from the fund.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 895, § 1.